nl: Schilderoppervlak gronderingstype: Absorberende ondergrond; Acrylgesso (universeel); Transparante gesso; Gekleurde gesso; Geen primer/coating; Olie-ondergrond; Aquarelondergrond; Overig
vi: Loại sơn lót bề mặt: Lớp nền thấm hút; Sơn lót acrylic gesso (đa năng); Sơn lót gesso trong suốt; Sơn lót gesso màu; Không có lớp lót/phủ; Lớp nền sơn dầu; Lớp nền màu nước; Khác
pt-PT: tipo de preparação da superfície de pintura: Fundo absorvente; Gesso acrílico (universal); Gesso transparente; Gesso colorido; Sem primário/revestimento; Fundo a óleo; Fundo para aguarela; Outro
es: Tipo de imprimación de superficie para pintura: Imprimación absorbente; Gesso acrílico (universal); Gesso transparente; Gesso de color; Sin imprimación/revestimiento; Imprimación al óleo; Imprimación para acuarela; Otro
fr: Type d’apprêt de la surface à peindre: Fond absorbant; Gesso acrylique (universel); Gesso transparent; Gesso coloré; Sans apprêt/revêtement; Fond à l’huile; Fond pour aquarelle; Autre
bg-BG: Вид грундиране на повърхността за боядисване: Абсорбираща основа; Акрилен грунд (универсален); Прозрачен грунд; Оцветен грунд; Без грунд/покритие; Маслена основа; Акварелна основа; Друго
sv: Grunderingstyp för målningsyta: Absorberande grund; Akrylgesso (universell); Genomskinlig gesso; Färgad gesso; Ingen primer/beläggning; Oljegrund; Akvarellgrund; Övrigt
en: Painting surface priming type: Absorbent ground; Acrylic gesso (universal); Clear gesso; Colored gesso; No primer/coating; Oil ground; Watercolor ground; Other
lt-LT: Tapybos paviršiaus gruntavimo tipas: Sugeriamasis gruntas; Akrilinis gesas (universalus); Skaidrus gesas; Spalvotas gesas; Be grunto / dangos; Aliejinis gruntas; Akvarelinis gruntas; Kita
ja: 塗装面下塗りタイプ: 吸収性下地; アクリルジェッソ (汎用); クリアジェッソ; カラージェッソ; プライマー/コーティングなし; オイルグラウンド; 水彩画用下地; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de primer da superfície de pintura: Fundo absorvente; Gesso acrílico (universal); Gesso transparente; Gesso colorido; Sem primer/revestimento; Fundo a óleo; Fundo para aquarela; Outro
zh-TW: 繪畫表面底漆類型: 吸收性打底; 壓克力打底劑 (通用); 透明打底劑; 著色打底劑; 無底漆/塗層; 油性打底; 水彩打底; 其他
hu: Festőfelület alapozásának típusa: Nedvszívó alapozás; Akril gesso (univerzális); Átlátszó gesso; Színezett gesso; Nincs alapozás/bevonat; Olaj alapozás; Akvarell alapozás; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ základnej úpravy povrchu: Absorpčný podklad; Akrylové gesso (univerzálne); Priehľadné gesso; Farebné gesso; Bez základného náteru/povrchovej úpravy; Olejový podklad; Akvarelový podklad; Iné
el: Τύπος ασταρώματος επιφάνειας βαφής: Απορροφητικό υπόστρωμα; Ακρυλικό gesso (γενικής χρήσης); Διάφανο gesso; Χρωματιστό gesso; Χωρίς αστάρι/επίστρωση; Υπόστρωμα λαδιού; Υπόστρωμα ακουαρέλας; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta temeljnog premaza za površinu za bojanje: Upijajuća podloga; Akrilni gesso (univerzalni); Prozirni gesso; Gesso u boji; Bez temeljnog premaza/sloja; Uljna podloga; Podloga za akvarel; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta temeljnega premaza slikarske površine: Vpojna podlaga; Akrilni gesso (univerzalni); Prozorni gesso; Barvni gesso; Brez premaza/obloge; Oljna podlaga; Akvarelna podlaga; Drugo
fi: Maalauspohjan pohjustustapa: Imevä pohja; Akryyligesso (yleis); Kirkas gesso; Värillinen gesso; Ei pohjamaalia/pinnoitetta; Öljypohja; Akvarellipohja; Muu
ko: 도장면 프라이밍 유형: 흡수성 바닥; 아크릴 제소(범용); 투명 제소; 컬러 제소; 프라이머/코팅 없음; 오일 그라운드; 수채화 그라운드; 기타
nb: Grunningstype for maleoverflate: Absorberende underlag; Akrylgesso (universell); Klar gesso; Farget gesso; Ingen grunning/belegg; Oljegrunning; Akvarellgrunning; Annet
tr: Boya yüzeyi astar tipi: Emici zemin; Akrilik jeso (evrensel); Şeffaf jeso; Renkli jeso; Astar/kaplama yok; Yağlı zemin; Sulu boya zemini; Diğer
da: Type grunder til malingsoverflade: Sugende bund; Akrylgesso (universel); Klar gesso; Farvet gesso; Ingen grunder/belægning; Oliebund; Akvarelbund; Anden
de: Grundierungsart der Maloberfläche: Saugender Grund; Acrylgesso (universell); Transparentes Gesso; Farbiges Gesso; Keine Grundierung/Beschichtung; Ölgrund; Aquarellgrund; Sonstige
th: ประเภทของสีรองพื้นสำหรับทาสี: รองพื้นแบบดูดซับ; อะคริลิกเจสโซ่ (อเนกประสงค์); เจสโซ่แบบใส; เจสโซ่สี; ไม่ลงรองพื้น/เคลือบ; รองพื้นสีน้ำมัน; รองพื้นสีน้ำ; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di primer per superfici di pittura: Fondo assorbente; Gesso acrilico (universale); Gesso trasparente; Gesso colorato; Nessun primer/rivestimento; Fondo a olio; Fondo per acquerello; Altro
zh-CN: 涂装表面底漆类型: 吸水性底涂; 丙烯底料（通用）; 透明底料; 有色底料; 无底漆/涂层; 油性底涂; 水彩底涂; 其他
cs: Typ základního nátěru na lakovaný povrch: Savý podklad; Akrylové šepsování (univerzální); Průhledné šepsování; Barevné šepsování; Bez základního nátěru / šepsu; Olejový podklad; Akvarelový podklad; Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul de grunduire al suprafeței de pictură: Grund absorbant; Gesso acrilic (universal); Gesso transparent; Gesso colorat; Fără grund/acoperire; Grund de ulei; Grund pentru acuarelă; Altele
ru: Тип грунтовки художественной поверхности: Впитывающий грунт; Акриловый гессо (универсальный); Прозрачный гессо; Цветной гессо; Без грунта/покрытия; Масляный грунт; Акварельный грунт; Другое
pl: Typ gruntowania powierzchni malarskiej: Podkład chłonny; Gesso akrylowe (uniwersalne); Przezroczyste gesso; Barwione gesso; Bez gruntu/powłoki; Podkład olejny; Podkład akwarelowy; Inne